Washington statutes.
RCW 41.14.040

Combined system authorized in counties with populations of less than forty thousand.

Any counties with populations of less than forty thousand, whether contiguous or not, are authorized to establish and operate a combined civil service system to serve all counties so combined. The combination of any such counties shall be effective whenever each board of county commissioners of the counties involved adopts a resolution declaring intention to participate in the operation of a combined county civil service system in accordance with agreements made between any such counties. Any such combined county civil service commission shall serve the employees of each county sheriff's office impartially and according to need.

All matters affecting the combined civil service commission, including the selection of commissioners, shall be decided by majority vote of all the county commissioners of the counties involved.

All the provisions of this chapter shall apply equally to any such combined civil service system.

[ 1991 c 363 s 114; 1959 c 1 s 4 (Initiative Measure No. 23, approved November 4, 1958).]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.